Maine, session 132, LD284.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §941, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 729, §4, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §941, sub-§1, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. Commission Counsel.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION, MAINE
Human Rights Commission - Regulation 0150
Initiative: Reclassifies one Public Service Coordinator III position to a major policy-
influencing position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,976 $10,447
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,976 $10,447
Page 1 - 132LR0452(03)